Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5224HV (1) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2492 Section 1. Section 257.11, subsection 5, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) In order to provide additional funding to increase 3 student opportunities and redirect more resources to student 4 programming for school districts that share operational 5 functions, a district that shares with a political subdivision 6 one or more operational functions of a curriculum director, 7 master social worker, independent social worker, work-based 8 learning coordinator, special education director, career and 9 technical education instructor, mental health professional 10 who holds a statement of recognition issued by the board 11 of educational examiners, college and career transition 12 counselor or coordinator, school resource officer, or school 13 counselor, or one or more operational functions in the areas 14 of superintendent management, business management, human 15 resources, transportation, or operation and maintenance for at 16 least twenty percent of the school year shall be assigned a 17 supplementary weighting for each shared operational function. 18 A school district that shares an operational function in 19 the area of superintendent management shall be assigned a 20 supplementary weighting of nine pupils for the function. A 21 school district that shares an operational function in the area 22 of business management, human resources, transportation, or 23 operation and maintenance shall be assigned a supplementary 24 weighting of five pupils for the function. A school district 25 that shares the operational functions of a curriculum director; 26 a master social worker or an independent social worker licensed 27 under chapters 147 and 154C ; a work-based learning coordinator; 28 a special education director; a career and technical education 29 instructor; a mental health professional who holds a statement 30 of recognition issued by the board of educational examiners; 31 a college and career transition counselor or coordinator; 32 a school resource officer; or a school counselor shall be 33 assigned a supplementary weighting of three pupils for the 34 function. The additional weighting shall be assigned for 35 -1- LSB 5224HV (1) 91 mb/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 2492 each discrete operational function shared. However, a school 1 district may receive the additional weighting under this 2 subsection for sharing the services of an individual with 3 a political subdivision or another school district even if 4 the type of operational function performed by the individual 5 for the school district and the type of operational function 6 performed by the individual for the political subdivision or 7 another school district are not the same operational function, 8 so long as either both operational functions are eligible for 9 weighting under this subsection or the operational function 10 the individual performs for the school district is special 11 education director. In either case, the school district 12 shall be assigned the additional weighting for the type of 13 operational function that the individual performs for the 14 school district, and the school district shall not receive 15 additional weighting for any other function performed by the 16 individual. The operational function sharing arrangement does 17 not need to be a newly implemented sharing arrangement to 18 receive supplementary weighting under this subsection . 19 Sec. 2. Section 257.11, subsection 5, paragraph a, 20 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended by adding the following 21 new subparagraph division: 22 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH DIVISION . (0a) âCareer and technical 23 education instructorâ means a licensed teacher who holds a 24 career and technical endorsement for grades five through 25 twelve, including in agriculture, family consumer sciences, 26 industrial technology, business, or information technology, 27 or an individual who holds a career and technical education 28 authorization for grades five through twelve. 29